Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 8 Discharge of Substances Dangerous to Navigation or Property

Cross references.

Use of anti-syphon devices for irrigation systems, §

2-1-4

.

Disposal of sewage and waste into waters of state generally, §

12-5-29

.

Control of soil erosion and sedimentation, T. 12, C. 7.

52-8-1.
Throwing stone, gravel, or other ballast into navigable waters.

Any master of a vessel or watercraft who shall throw or permit to be thrown any stone, gravel, or other ballast from on board the vessel or watercraft into any of the waters of any bay or harbor of this state or within three miles of the outside bar of any such bay or harbor shall forfeit a sum not less than $500.00 nor more than $2,000.00 for each such offense. One-half of the forfeiture shall be paid to the person who first gives information of the offense to the Board of Pilotage Commissioners and the other half shall be paid to the use of the commissioners of the harbors, respectively, for improvement of navigation. In addition, any such master may be punished by imprisonment for not over three months, in the discretion of the court.

History.

Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 50; Code 1863, § 1486; Code 1868, § 1543; Code 1873, § 1537; Code 1882, § 1537; Civil Code 1895, § 1685; Penal Code 1895, § 646; Civil Code 1910, § 1931; Penal Code 1910, § 686; Code 1933, §§ 98-102, 98-9902.

52-8-2.
Duty of pilots to report unlawful discharge of stone, gravel, or other ballast into bays and harbors.

Every pilot having knowledge of the discharge of any stone, gravel, or other ballast in any bay or harbor of this state, or within three miles of the outside bar of any such bay or harbor, as specified in Code Section 52-8-1, must give information thereof to the Board of Pilotage Commissioners as soon as practicable; and, upon his failure to do so, such pilot shall be deprived of his license and shall be forever disqualified for the office of pilot.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1488; Code 1868, § 1545; Code 1873, § 1539; Code 1882, § 1539; Civil Code 1895, § 1687; Civil Code 1910, § 1933; Code 1933, § 98-103.

52-8-3.
Recovery of forfeiture; attachment and replevy of vessels.

Upon receipt by the Board of Pilotage Commissioners of satisfactory evidence of the offense specified in Code Section 52-8-1, it shall be the duty of the board to proceed to recover the forfeiture provided for in that Code section by process of attachment in the name of the state, which may be issued as other attachments on the oath of the informer or of one of the commissioners and may be levied on the vessel from which the offense was committed. The vessel may be replevied by the master, owner, or consignee by giving bond, payable to the state, in double the amount of the penalty, with the condition to have the vessel forthcoming to satisfy such judgment as may be rendered in the action.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1487; Code 1868, § 1544; Code 1873, § 1538; Code 1882, § 1538; Civil Code 1895, § 1686; Civil Code 1910, § 1932; Code 1933, § 98-104.

52-8-4.
Power of municipalities to prohibit throwing or depositing of substances which might lessen depth of navigable waters.

The corporate authorities of any municipality in this state are authorized, within their respective jurisdictions, to prohibit, under proper penalties, the throwing or depositing in navigable waters of any substance of any nature or kind which might in any degree lessen the depth of navigable water within the jurisdictional limits of such municipalities.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1489; Code 1868, § 1546; Code 1873, § 1540; Code 1882, § 1540; Civil Code 1895, § 1688; Civil Code 1910, § 1934; Code 1933, § 98-105; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52.

52-8-5.
Power of municipalities to prohibit throwing or depositing of substances dangerous to navigation or injurious to vessels.

The corporate authorities of any municipality in this state are authorized, within their respective jurisdictions, to prohibit under proper penalties the throwing or depositing in navigable waters, of any substance which they might consider dangerous to navigation or injurious to vessels or to property abutting upon such navigable waters; and the master of any vessel from which any forbidden substance is thrown or deposited in violation of any ordinance promulgated under this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 26.